Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.393

Technical plan of the K-20 telecommunications system and ongoing system enhancements—Contents.

The office, in conjunction with the K-20 network users, shall maintain a technical plan of the K-20 telecommunications system and ongoing system enhancements. The office shall ensure that the technical plan adheres to the goals and objectives established under RCW 43.105.054. The technical plan shall provide for:

(1) A telecommunications backbone connecting educational service districts, the main campuses of public baccalaureate institutions, all of the campuses of public research institutions, and the main campuses of community colleges and technical colleges.

(2)(a) Connection to the K-20 network by entities that include, but need not be limited to: School districts, public higher education off-campus and extension centers, and campuses of community colleges and technical colleges, as prioritized by the chief information officer; (b) distance education facilities and components for entities listed in this subsection and subsection (1) of this section; and (c) connection for independent nonprofit institutions of higher education, provided that:

(i) The office and each independent nonprofit institution of higher education to be connected agree in writing to terms and conditions of connectivity. The terms and conditions shall ensure, among other things, that the provision of K-20 services does not violate Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution and that the institution shall adhere to K-20 network policies; and

(ii) The office determines that inclusion of the independent nonprofit institutions of higher education will not significantly affect the network's eligibility for federal universal service fund discounts or subsidies.

(3) Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to, connections to public libraries, state and local governments, community resource centers, and the private sector.

[ 2017 c 52 s 14; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 215; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 720. Formerly RCW 43.41A.095.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.